test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_lahteet_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - lähteet - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     lähteet+V+Inf: lähteet
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lähđen
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lähđet
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lähtee
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lähđemä
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lähđettä
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lähđethään
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lähđin
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lähđit
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lähti
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lähđimä
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lähđittä
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lähđethiin
     lähteet+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lähteny
     lähteet+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lähđetty
     lähteet+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: lähtenheet
     lähteet+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lähteevä
     lähteet+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lähteevät
     lähteet+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lähđettävä
     lähteet+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lähđettävät

     lähteet+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: lähtisin
     lähteet+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: lähtisit
     lähteet+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: lähtis
     lähteet+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: lähtisimmä
     lähteet+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: lähtisittä
     lähteet+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: lähđettäis
     lähteet+V+Pass+Cond: lähđettäis

     lähteet+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: lähđe
     lähteet+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: lähtekkää
     
     lähteet+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: lähtemässä
     lähteet+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: lähtemästä
     lähteet+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: lähtemhään
     lähteet+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: lähtemällä
     lähteet+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: lähtemättä
